Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-672.03
Ordinance; protest; filing; effect.

If a written protest signed by owners of the property located in an improvement district provided in section 16-672.01 and representing a majority of the front footage which may become subject to assessment for the cost of the improvement is filed with the city clerk within three days before the date of the meeting for the consideration of such ordinance, such ordinance shall not be passed.

Laws 1961, c. 46, § 3, p. 178;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 127.